Utah statutes.
75-7-413.   Cy pres.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2), if a particular
charitable purpose becomes unlawful, impracticable, impossible to achieve, or
wasteful:
(a)  the trust does not fail, in whole or in part;
(b)  the trust property does not revert to the settlor or the settlor's
successors in interest; and
(c)  the court may apply cy pres to modify or terminate the trust by directing
that the trust property be applied or distributed, in whole or in part, in a
manner consistent with the settlor's charitable purposes.
(2)  A provision in the terms of a charitable trust that would result in
distribution of the trust property to a noncharitable beneficiary prevails
over the power of the court under Subsection (1) to apply cy pres to modify or
terminate the trust only if, when the provision takes effect:
(a)  the trust property is to revert to the settlor and the settlor is still
living; or
(b)  fewer than 21 years have elapsed since the date of the trust's creation.
